test/src/morphology/N-kukki_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kukki: # Noun 195 'eng /est putukas/fin' - full paradigm
     kukki+N+Sg+Nom: kukki
     kukki+N+Sg+Gen: kukīz
     kukki+N+Sg+Par: kukīzt
     kukki+N+Sg+Dat: kukīzõn
     kukki+N+Sg+Ins: kukīzõks
     kukki+N+Sg+Ill: kukīzõ
     kukki+N+Sg+Ela: kukīzõst
     kukki+N+Pl+Nom: kukkizt
     kukki+N+Pl+Gen: kukkizt
     kukki+N+Pl+Par: kukīži
     kukki+N+Pl+Dat: kukkiztõn
     kukki+N+Pl+Ins: kukkiztõks
     kukki+N+Pl+Ill: kukīžiz
     kukki+N+Pl+Ela: kukīžist
